Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-340
State hospitals for the mentally ill; voluntary patient; discharge; when.

Any voluntary patient in a state hospital for the mentally ill who no longer meets the clinical and legal requirements for treatment at such hospital shall be discharged by the chief executive officer of such hospital.

G.S.1873, c. 31, § 42, p. 421;

R.S.1913, § 7268;

C.S.1922, § 6923;

C.S.1929, § 83-728;

R.S.1943, § 83-340;

Laws 1947, c. 335, § 30, p. 1068;

Laws 1963, c. 526, § 9, p. 1652;

Laws 1969, c. 818, § 21, p. 3122;

Laws 1981, LB 95, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 1155, § 91;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 227;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 135.

Any patient who is cured should be immediately discharged. State v. Noll, 171 Neb. 831, 108 N.W.2d 108 (1961).